Illinois, session 104th, HB1715.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    (20 ILCS 510/510-200 rep.)5    Section 5. The Department of Children and Family Services 6Powers Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 7amended by repealing Section 510-200. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.